Tennessee, session 114, HB1832.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-302(f), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead the following:
The department shall not issue a for-hire endorsement unless the applicant has
had at least two (2) years of unrestricted driving experience prior to the date of
application, and the department is fully satisfied as to the applicant's good character,
competency, and fitness to be so employed, and the applicant is eighteen (18) years of
age and will be operating a Class D vehicle. Nothing in this subsection (f) authorizes
anyone under nineteen (19) years of age to operate a commercial motor vehicle as
defined in 49 CFR Part 390. Notwithstanding this subsection (f), the department is
authorized to issue a for-hire endorsement to operate a Class D vehicle to an applicant
who:
(1) Is at least sixteen (16) years of age and who is not currently under
any driver license suspension, cancellation, or revocation in this or any other
state, and the vehicle is owned by the applicant's family business to conduct
deliveries of goods and products exclusively for family business; or
(2) Would otherwise qualify for a for-hire endorsement but for the
requirement of at least two (2) years of unrestricted driving experience prior to
the date of application if the applicant has completed a sentence of incarceration
after conviction for an offense and currently has a restricted license for unpaid
HB1832
011075
- 1 -

fines and court costs and is making payments in accordance with a payment
plan.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011075